Hawaii statutes.
§42F-105 Allotment. Contracts
to disburse and appropriations for grants shall be subject to the allotment
system generally applicable to all appropriations made by the legislature. [L
1997, c 190, pt of §3; am L 2014, c 96, §9]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next